Utah statutes.
19-6-415.   Participation of exempt and above ground tanks.

(1)  An underground storage tank exempt from regulation under 40 C.F.R., Part 280, Subpart A, may become eligible for payments from the Petroleum Storage Tank Trust Fund if it:

(a) (i)  is a farm or residential tank with a capacity of 1,100 gallons or less and is used for storing motor fuel for noncommercial purposes;

(ii)  is used for storing heating oil for consumptive use on the premises where stored; or

(iii)  is used for any oxygenate blending component for motor fuels;

(b)  complies with the requirements of Section 19-6-412;

(c)  meets other requirements established by rules made under Section 19-6-403; and

(d)  pays registration and tank fees and environmental assurance fees, equivalent to those fees outlined in Sections 19-6-408, 19-6-410.5, and 19-6-411.

(2)  An above ground petroleum storage tank may become eligible for payments from the Petroleum Storage Tank Trust Fund if the owner or operator:

(a)  pays those fees that are equivalent to the registration and tank fees and environmental assurance fees under Sections 19-6-408, 19-6-410.5, and 19-6-411;

(b)  complies with the requirements of Section 19-6-412; and

(c)  meets other requirements established by rules made under Section 19-6-403.



Amended by Chapter 172, 1997 General Session

